Nevada, session 83, AB74-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 396 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto a new section to read as follows:
1. The Board of Regents may enter into an agreement to
affiliate with a publicly or privately owned entity, whether for
profit or not for profit, to further promote and enhance an
educational program or student life at an institution within the
System.
2. An agreement entered into pursuant to this section must
include, without limitation:
(a) Standards that must be met by the entity;
(b) An allocation of any costs or profits that must be shared
between the entity and the institution;
(c) Identification of shared goals and responsibilities;
(d) Provisions governing the joint employment and supervision
of employees, if applicable;
(e) Provisions governing the shared review and allocation of
the use of facilities, resources and employees, if applicable; and
(f) A provision stating that the requirements of NRS 338.020 to
338.090, inclusive, apply to any construction work performed
under the agreement even if the construction work does not
qualify as a public work, as defined in NRS 338.010.
Sec. 2. NRS 396.255 is hereby amended to read as follows:
396.255 The Board of Regents shall, to carry out the purposes
of subsection 3 of NRS 281.221, subsection 3 of NRS 281.230,
subsection 3 of NRS 281A.430 and NRS 396.1215, and section 1 of
this act, establish policies governing the contracts that faculty
members and employees of the System may enter into or benefit
from.
-
*AB74_R3*

– 3 –
Sec. 2.1. Chapter 338 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2.2 to 2.8, inclusive, of
this act.
Sec. 2.2. As used in sections 2.2 to 2.8, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
in sections 2.3 to 2.7, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 2.3. “Concession” means any lease, ground lease,
operating agreement or other binding agreement between a public
body and a private partner for the use or control, in whole or in
part, of a facility by a private partner.
Sec. 2.4. “Facility” means any existing, enhanced, upgraded
or new facility used or useful for the use of persons, including,
without limitation, any construction, alteration, repair, renovation,
demolition or remodeling necessary to complete any building,
structure or other improvement that is predominantly vertical,
including, without limitation, a building, structure or improvement
for the support, shelter and enclosure of persons, animals, chattels
or movable property of any kind and any other work or
improvement appurtenant thereto. The term:
1. Includes related or ancillary facilities used or useful for
any purpose of the facility, including, without limitation,
administrative buildings, structures, parking facilities and other
related equipment or property that is needed or used to support the
facility.
2. Does not include a transportation facility as that term is
defined in NRS 338.1583.
Sec. 2.5. “Private partner” means a person with whom a
public body enters into a public-private partnership.
Sec. 2.6. “Public-private partnership” means a contract
entered into by a public body and a private partner.
Sec. 2.7. “User fee” means a fee or other similar charge,
including, without limitation, any incidental, account
maintenance or administrative fee or charge imposed on a person
for his or her use of a facility by a public body or private partner
pursuant to a public-private partnership.
Sec. 2.8. 1. A public body may enter into a public-private
partnership to plan, finance, design, construct, improve, maintain,
operate or acquire, or any combination thereof, a facility.
2. A public-private partnership may include, without
limitation:
(a) A predevelopment agreement leading to another
implementing agreement for a facility as described in this
subsection;
(b) A design-build contract;
-
*AB74_R3*

– 4 –
(c) A design-build contract that includes the financing,
maintenance or operation, or any combination thereof, of the
facility;
(d) A contract involving a construction manager at risk;
(e) A concession;
(f) A construction agreement that includes the financing,
maintenance or operation, or any combination thereof, of the
facility;
(g) An operation and maintenance agreement for a facility;
(h) Any other method or agreement for completion of the
facility that the public body determines will serve the public
interest; or
(i) Any combination of paragraphs (a) to (h), inclusive.
3. A public-private partnership shall include a provision
stating that:
(a) The requirements of NRS 338.013 to 338.090, inclusive,
apply to any construction work performed under the agreement
even if the construction work does not qualify as a public work, as
defined in NRS 338.010.
(b) The provisions of this chapter that require public bidding
apply with respect to the awarding of contracts or procurement of
goods in connection with the construction of a facility under the
agreement if 25 percent or more of the cost of constructing the
facility is financed with public money. Such public bidding is not
required if the method of procurement selected does not require
public bidding pursuant to this chapter.
Sec. 2.9. NRS 338.1711 is hereby amended to read as follows:
338.1711 1. Except as otherwise provided in this section and
NRS 338.158 to 338.16995, inclusive, and sections 2.1 to 2.8,
inclusive, of this act, a public body shall contract with a prime
contractor for the construction of a public work for which the
estimated cost exceeds $100,000.
2. A public body may contract with a design-build team for the
design and construction of a public work that is a discrete project if
the public body has approved the use of a design-build team for the
design and construction of the public work and the public work has
an estimated cost which exceeds $5,000,000.
Sec. 3. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2023.
H
-
*AB74_R3*